Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.56.200

Verification and canvass of signatures—Procedure—Statistical sampling.

(1) Upon the filing of a recall petition, the elections officer shall proceed to verify and canvass the names of legal voters on the petition.

(2) The verification and canvass of signatures on the petition may be observed by persons representing the advocates and opponents of the proposed recall so long as they make no record of the names, addresses, or other information on the petitions or related records during the verification process except upon the order of the superior court. The elections officer may limit the number of observers to not fewer than two on each side, if in his or her opinion a greater number would cause undue delay or disruption of the verification process. Any such limitation shall apply equally to both sides. If the elections officer finds the same name signed to more than one petition, he or she shall reject all but the first such valid signature.

(3) Where the recall of a statewide elected official is sought, the secretary of state may use any statistical sampling techniques for verification and canvassing which have been adopted by rule for canvassing initiative petitions under RCW 29A.72.230. No petition will be rejected on the basis of any statistical method employed. No petition will be accepted on the basis of any statistical method employed if such method indicates that the petition contains less than the number of signatures of legal voters required by Article I, section 33 (Amendment 8) of the state Constitution.

[ 2003 c 111 s 1416. Prior: 1984 c 170 s 7; 1977 ex.s. c 361 s 107; 1965 c 9 s 29.82.090; prior: 1913 c 146 s 9, part; RRS s 5358, part. Formerly RCW 29.82.090.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Severability—1977 ex.s. c 361: See notes following RCW 29A.16.040.